Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 47.04.035 and 2022 c 182 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to improve the safety, mobility, and accessibility of state highways, it is the intent of the legislature that the department must incorporate the principles of complete streets with facilities that provide street access with all users in mind, including pedestrians, bicyclists, and public transportation users, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 47.24.020 concerning responsibility beyond the curb of state rights-of-way. As such, state transportation construction projects, excluding chip seal, repairs, maintenance, or repaving projects, starting design on or after July 1, 2022, and that are $500,000 or more, must:(a) Identify those locations on state rights-of-way that do not have a complete and Americans with disabilities act accessible sidewalk or shared-use path, that do not have bicycle facilities in the form of a bike lane or adjacent parallel trail or shared-use path, that have such facilities on a state route within a population center that has a posted speed in excess of 30 miles per hour and no buffer or physical separation from vehicular traffic for pedestrians and bicyclists, and/or that have a design that hampers the ability of motorists to see a crossing pedestrian with sufficient time to stop given posted speed limits and roadway configuration;(b) Consult with local jurisdictions to confirm existing and planned active transportation connections along or across the location; identification of connections to existing and planned public transportation services, ferry landings, commuter and passenger rail, and airports; the existing and planned facility type(s) within the local jurisdiction that connect to the location; and the potential use of speed management techniques to minimize crash exposure and severity;(c) Adjust the speed limit to a lower speed with appropriate modifications to roadway design and operations to achieve the desired operating speed in those locations where this speed management approach aligns with local plans or ordinances, particularly in those contexts that present a higher possibility of serious injury or fatal crashes occurring based on land use context, observed crash data, crash potential, roadway characteristics that are likely to increase exposure, or a combination thereof, in keeping with a safe system approach and with the intention of ultimately eliminating serious and fatal crashes; and(d) Plan, design, and construct facilities providing context-sensitive solutions that contribute to network connectivity and safety for pedestrians, bicyclists, and people accessing public transportation and other modal connections, such facilities to include Americans with disabilities act accessible sidewalks or shared-use paths, bicyclist facilities, and crossings as needed to integrate the state route into the local network.(2)(a) Projects ((undertaken for emergent work required to reopen a state highway in the event of a natural disaster or other emergency repair))that are not required to comply with the provisions of this section:(i) Work required to reopen a state highway in the event of a natural disaster, weather event, obstructions to travel, or other emergency repair;(ii) Work to keep the system in a state of good repair that does not require expansion of the roadway, including chip sealing and pavement replacement projects.(b) This subsection does not prohibit the department from selecting appropriate complete streets modifications for facilities as part of any of the projects in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.(3) Maintenance of facilities constructed under this provision shall be as provided under existing law.(4) This section does not create a private right of action.(5) The department is not required to conduct the analysis or incorporate facilities for pedestrians, bicyclists, or public transportation users in projects where such facilities do not currently exist for justifiable reasons, where there are safety concerns if such facilities were added that are not easily addressed, or where the additional cost to the project is unreasonable considering the project's goals and expected usage of the facility.--- END ---